Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2739
Domestic relations judgment or final order; appeal.

A judgment rendered or final order made by a county court in a domestic relations matter as defined in section 25-2740 may be reversed, vacated, or modified by the Court of Appeals in the same manner as judgments and final orders of the district court under sections 25-1911 to 25-1929.

Laws 1996, LB 1296, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 229, § 6.